Tennessee, session 114, SB1578.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1.
(a) The facility providing water and wastewater services to the Megasite
Authority of West Tennessee pursuant to § 64-9-107 is hereby designated the "Michael
Banks Water Treatment Facility."
(b) From existing resources, the Megasite Authority of West Tennessee created
pursuant to § 64-9-102 is directed to erect suitable signs or to affix suitable markers
designating such facility as the "Michael Banks Water Treatment Facility."
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1578
010992
- 1 -